Massachusetts, session 194th, S1695.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 41 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
deleting subsection (a) in its entirety.
SECTION 2. Section 41 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
deleting in subsection (b) the following:- “provided, however, that for transfers and purchases of
firearms that are not rifles and shotguns that are not large capacity or semiautomatic, the
transferee shall also have a valid permit to purchase under section 131A.”
SECTION 3. Section 41 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
deleting in subsection (c) the following:- "(C) a person with a firearm identification card under
section 129B; provided, however, that for transfers and purchases of firearms that are not rifles
and shotguns that are not large capacity or semi-automatic, the transferee shall have a valid
permit to purchase under section 131A."
of 2

SECTION 4. Section 41 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
deleting subsection (e) in its entirety.
of 2